de: Platzierung/Titel der Auszeichnungsschleife: 1. Platz; 2. Platz; 3. Platz; Best in Show; Champion; Finalist; Grand Champion; Gast; Ehrenvolle Erwähnung; Auswahl der Jury; Teilnehmer:in; Reserve Champion; Mitarbeiter:in; Freiwillige:r; Gewinner:in; Sonstige
tr: Ödül kurdelesinde belirtilen derece veya unvan: Birincilik; İkincilik; Üçüncülük; Serginin en iyisi; Şampiyon; Finalist; Büyük şampiyon; Misafir; Mansiyon; Jüri seçimi; Katılımcı; Yedek şampiyon; Personel; Gönüllü; Kazanan; Diğer
zh-CN: 获奖丝带名次/称号: 第一名; 第二名; 第三名; 全场总冠军; 冠军; 决赛入围者; 全场大奖; 嘉宾; 优秀奖; 评委选择奖; 参与者; 亚军; 员工; 志愿者; 获胜者; 其他
fr: Emplacement ou titre du ruban de récompense: 1re place; 2e place; 3e place; Meilleur de l’exposition; Champion; Finaliste; Grand champion; Invité; Mention honorable; Choix du jury; Participant; Champion de réserve; Employés; Bénévole; Gagnant; Autre
ja: 賞品リボンの配置／タイトル: 1位; 2位; 3位; ベスト・イン・ショー; チャンピオン; ファイナリスト; グランドチャンピオン; ゲスト; 佳作; 審査員特別賞; 参加賞; リザーブチャンピオン; スタッフ; ボランティア; 優勝; その他
es: Ubicación/título del listón de premio: 1er lugar; 2do lugar; 3er lugar; Mejor del evento; Campeón; Finalista; Gran campeón; Invitado; Mención honorífica; Elección del jurado; Participante; Campeón de reserva; Personal; Voluntario; Ganador; Otro
nb: Prissløyfe-plassering/tittel: 1. plass; 2. plass; 3. plass; Best in show; Champion; Finalist; Grand champion; Gjest; Hederlig omtale; Dommerens valg; Deltaker; Reserve champion; Stab; Frivillig; Vinner; Annet
nl: Awardlint plaatsing/titel: 1e plaats; 2e plaats; 3e plaats; Best in show; Kampioen; Finalist; Grootkampioen; Gast; Eervolle vermelding; Keuze van de jury; Deelnemer; Reservekampioen; Medewerkers; Vrijwilliger; Winnaar; Overig
en: Award ribbon placement/title: 1st place; 2nd place; 3rd place; Best in show; Champion; Finalist; Grand champion; Guest; Honorable mention; Judge's choice; Participant; Reserve champion; Staff; Volunteer; Winner; Other
pt-PT: Classificação/título da fita de prémio: 1.º lugar; 2.º lugar; 3.º lugar; Melhor da exposição; Campeão; Finalista; Grande campeão; Convidado; Menção honrosa; Escolha do júri; Participante; Campeão de reserva; Equipa; Voluntário; Vencedor; Outro
fi: Palkintonauhan sijoitus/nimike: 1. sija; 2. sija; 3. sija; Näyttelyn paras; Mestari; Finalisti; Suurmestari; Vieras; Kunniamaininta; Tuomarin valinta; Osallistuja; Varamestari; Henkilöstö; Vapaaehtoinen; Voittaja; Muu
it: Posizionamento/titolo del nastro premio: 1º posto; 2º posto; 3º posto; Migliore della mostra; Campione; Finalista; Gran campione; Ospite; Menzione d’onore; Scelta del giudice; Partecipante; Campione di riserva; Staff; Volontario; Vincitore; Altro
ru: Место или звание на наградной ленте: 1-е место; 2-е место; 3-е место; Лучший на выставке; Чемпион; Финалист; Гранд-чемпион; Гость; Почетное упоминание; Выбор судей; Участник; Резервный чемпион; Персонал; Волонтер; Победитель; Другое
ko: 상장 리본 배치 위치/타이틀: 1등; 2등; 3등; 최우수상; 우승; 결선 진출자; 그랜드 챔피언; 게스트; 장려상; 심사위원 특별상; 참가자; 준우승; 직원/담당자; 자원봉사자; 우승자; 기타
vi: Vị trí/tiêu đề ruy băng giải thưởng: Hạng 1; Hạng 2; Hạng 3; Xuất sắc nhất; Quán quân; Lọt vào chung kết; Đại quán quân; Khách mời; Giải khuyến khích; Giải của ban giám khảo; Người tham gia; Á quân; Nhân viên; Tình nguyện viên; Người chiến thắng; Khác
zh-TW: 絲帶獎章名次/頭銜: 第一名; 第二名; 第三名; 全場總冠軍; 冠軍; 決賽入圍者; 總冠軍; 來賓; 佳作; 評審特選獎; 參加者; 亞軍; 員工; 志工; 優勝者; 其他
lt-LT: Apdovanojimų juostelės rodymo vieta/titulas: 1 vieta; 2 vieta; 3 vieta; Geriausias parodoje; Čempionas; Finalininkas; Didysis čempionas; Svečias; Garbės paminėjimas; Teisėjų pasirinkimas; Dalyvis; Rezervinis čempionas; Personalas; Savanoris; Nugalėtojas; Kita
cs: Umístění/titul stuhy ocenění: 1. místo; 2. místo; 3. místo; Vítěz výstavy; Šampion; Finalista; Grand šampion; Host; Čestné uznání; Cena poroty; Účastník; Rezervní šampion; Zaměstnanci; Dobrovolník; Vítěz; Jiné
pt-BR: Posicionamento/título da fita de premiação: 1º lugar; 2º lugar; 3º lugar; Melhor da mostra; Campeão; Finalista; Grande campeão; Convidado; Menção honrosa; Escolha do juiz; Participante; Campeão reserva; Membro da equipe; Voluntário; Vencedor; Outros
sk-SK: Umiestnenie/titul na kokarde: 1. miesto; 2. miesto; 3. miesto; Víťaz výstavy; Šampión; Finalista; Grand šampión; Hosť; Čestné uznanie; Cena poroty; Účastník; Rezervný šampión; Personál; Dobrovoľník; Víťaz; Iné
sl-SI: Mesto/naziv na nagradnem traku: 1. mesto; 2. mesto; 3. mesto; Najboljše na razstavi; Prvak; Finalist; Veliki prvak; Gost; Častna omemba; Izbira sodnika; Udeleženec; Rezervni prvak; Osebje; Prostovoljec; Zmagovalec; Drugo
da: Placering af præmiebånd/titel: 1. plads; 2. plads; 3. plads; Best in show; Champion; Finalist; Grand champion; Gæst; Hædrende omtale; Dommerens valg; Deltager; Reserve champion; Medarbejder; Frivillig; Vinder; Andet
bg-BG: Позиция/титла на наградната панделка: 1-во място; 2-ро място; 3-то място; Най-добър в изложбата; Шампион; Финалист; Гранд шампион; Гост; Почетно отличие; Изборът на журито; Участник; Резервен шампион; Персонал; Доброволец; Победител; Друго
hr-HR: Plasman/titula nagradne vrpce: 1. mjesto; 2. mjesto; 3. mjesto; Najbolji na izložbi; Prvak; Finalist; Veliki prvak; Gost; Počasno priznanje; Izbor sudaca; Sudionik; Rezervni prvak; Osoblje; Volonter; Pobjednik; Ostalo
sv: Rosett-/prisutdelning: 1:a plats; 2:a plats; 3:e plats; Best in show; Champion; Finalist; Grand champion; Gäst; Hedersomnämnande; Domarens val; Deltagare; Reservchampion; Personal; Volontär; Vinnare; Övrigt
th: ตำแหน่ง/ข้อความบนริบบิ้นรางวัล: อันดับ 1; อันดับ 2; อันดับ 3; ชนะเลิศยอดเยี่ยม; แชมเปี้ยน; ผู้เข้ารอบสุดท้าย; แกรนด์แชมเปี้ยน; แขกรับเชิญ; รางวัลชมเชย; ขวัญใจกรรมการ; ผู้เข้าร่วม; รองแชมเปี้ยน; พนักงาน; อาสาสมัคร; ผู้ชนะ; อื่นๆ
pl: Miejsce/tytuł na wstążce nagrody: 1. miejsce; 2. miejsce; 3. miejsce; Najlepszy na wystawie; Champion; Finalista; Grand Champion; Gość; Wyróżnienie; Wybór sędziego; Uczestnik; Wiceczempion; Pracownicy; Wolontariusz; Zwycięzca; Inne
hu: Díjszalag elhelyezése/címe: 1. helyezett; 2. helyezett; 3. helyezett; Legjobb a kiállításon; Bajnok; Döntős; Nagybajnok; Vendég; Különdíj; Zsűri különdíja; Résztvevő; Tartalék bajnok; Személyzet; Önkéntes; Győztes; Egyéb
el: Τοποθέτηση/τίτλος κορδέλας βραβείου: 1η θέση; 2η θέση; 3η θέση; Καλύτερο της έκθεσης; Πρωταθλητής; Φιναλίστ; Μεγάλος πρωταθλητής; Επισκέπτης; Τιμητική διάκριση; Επιλογή κριτών; Συμμετέχων; Αναπληρωματικός πρωταθλητής; Προσωπικό; Εθελοντής; Νικητής; Άλλο
ro-RO: Poziționarea/titlul panglicii certificatului: Locul 1; Locul 2; Locul 3; Cel mai bun din expoziție; Campion; Finalist; Marele campion; Invitat; Mențiune de onoare; Alegerea juriului; Participant; Vicecampion; Personal; Voluntar; Câștigător; Altele